Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.755

Reporting of suspected abuse, abandonment, neglect, exploitation.

If a person who receives a copy of a supported decision-making agreement or is aware of the existence of a supported decision-making agreement has cause to believe that a vulnerable adult as defined in RCW 74.34.020 is being abused, abandoned, neglected (including self-neglect), or personally or financially exploited by the supporter, the person shall make a report to the department of social and health services, except where the person is exempted from the requirements to report abuse due to a confidential relationship recognized in statute, regulation, or professional standards.

[ 2020 c 312 s 612.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.